New York, session 2025-2026, A6984.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of section 458-a of the real 2 property tax law, as amended by chapter 100 of the laws of 1988, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (c) In addition to the exemptions provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) 5 of this subdivision, where the veteran received a compensation rating 6 from the United States veteran's administration or from the United 7 States department of defense because of a service connected disability, 8 qualifying residential real property shall be exempt from taxation to 9 the extent of the product of the assessed value of such property multi- 10 plied by fifty percent of the veteran's disability rating; provided, 11 however, that such exemption shall not exceed forty thousand dollars or 12 the product of forty thousand dollars multiplied by the latest state 13 equalization rate for the assessing unit, or in the case of a special 14 assessing unit, the latest class ratio, whichever is less. Additionally, 15 any veteran who received a compensation rating of one hundred percent 16 for a permanent and total service connected disability shall have the 17 first six thousand dollars of their property tax exempted regardless of 18 their real property tax assessment. For purposes of this paragraph, 19 where a person who served in the active military, naval or air service 20 during a period of war died in service of a service connected disabili- 21 ty, such person shall be deemed to have been assigned a compensation 22 rating of one hundred percent. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 24 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 25 assessment rolls prepared on the basis of taxable status dates occurring 26 on and after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10322-01-5